Rhode Island, session 2025, HB6237.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 16 of the General Laws entitled "EDUCATION" is hereby amended by
adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 117
STUDENT CULTURAL EXCHANGE PROGRAM
16-117-1. Program oversight.
(a) There is hereby established within the department of elementary and secondary
education a student cultural exchange program. The department of elementary and secondary
education ("department") may provide oversight of a two (2) year pilot program ("program")
commencing with the 2026-2027 school year. This program may be operated under a contract
between the department and a public or private entity that coordinates a national cultural exchange
program for students of this state.
(b) The program provided for by this section shall enable students in grade twelve (12) to
register to travel to a location in another state to stay with a host family in that state for a week of
experiences that allow students to explore similarities and differences in the political,
socioeconomic and cultural features of their place of residence and the location of the exchange.
(c) The department shall ensure that, to the greatest extent practicable, students
representing a diversity of schools from a diversity of school districts participate in the program.
(d) The department may award grants to encourage students to participate in the program
and to assist students who are participating in the program.

16-117-2. Participation.
(a) The department of elementary and secondary education shall ensure participation by
students to the greatest extent practicable, by July 1, 2028. The first year of the program shall
commence August 1, 2026, and the second year of the program shall commence August 1, 2027.
The targeted goal of participation shall be at least five (5) schools within the first year of the
program, and up to ten (10) schools in the second year. The further targeted goal is to establish the
program such that is able to continue beyond the two (2) year pilot period and become a
continuously and permanently funded program, if so extended by the general assembly pursuant to
§ 16-117-7.
(b) No later than September 1, 2028, the department shall submit an initial report to the
education committees of the house and senate on the number of students, school districts and
schools that participated in the program. The report may recommend to the general assembly
legislative changes related to the program.
16-117-3. Cultural exchange program fund.
(a) The cultural exchange program fund (hereinafter sometimes referred to as the “fund”)
shall be established by the state treasurer, separate and distinct from the general fund. Interest
earned on the cultural exchange program fund shall be credited to the fund.
(b) Monies in the cultural exchange program fund shall be continuously allocated to the
department of elementary and secondary education on a rolling basis for the purpose of providing
funding for the program described in this chapter, including the awarding of grants.
(c) The department, on behalf of the state, may solicit and accept gifts, grants and donations
from public and private sources including, but not limited to, charitable foundations and
grantmaking foundations, for the purpose of the program described in this chapter. Monies received
under this subsection shall be deposited into the cultural exchange program fund.
(d) The cultural exchange program fund shall consist of monies transferred from the
categorized education aid, other monies appropriated or transferred to the fund by the general
assembly, monies deposited as provided by this section, and any other monies deposited into the
fund from any source, including private entities.
16-117-4. Use of cultural exchange program funds.
The department of elementary and secondary education shall use monies in the statewide
cultural exchange program fund account only to provide funding for the national cultural exchange
program described in this chapter, and to fund costs incurred by the department in implementing
the provisions of this chapter.
16-117-5. Regulations.
LC002717 - Page 2 of 4

The council on elementary and secondary education shall adopt rules necessary for the
distribution of monies pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.
16-117-6. Initial funding.
For the years 2025 through 2028, the department of elementary and secondary education
shall transfer a sum sufficient from the categorical education aid to the cultural exchange program
fund established under this chapter to implement the provisions of this chapter. The fund shall be
eligible to receive funds starting in 2025.
16-117-7. Sunset.
The provisions of this chapter shall sunset and expire August 1, 2028, unless extended by
the general assembly.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002717
========
LC002717 - Page 3 of 4